Washington statutes.
RCW 19.100.020

Unlawful in certain instances to sell or offer to sell franchise if unregistered or not exempt.

(1) It is unlawful for any franchisor or subfranchisor to sell or offer to sell any franchise in this state unless the offer of the franchise has been registered under this chapter or exempted under RCW 19.100.030.

(2) For the purpose of this section, an offer to sell a franchise is made in this state when: (a) The offer is directed by the offeror into this state from within or outside this state and is received where it is directed, (b) the offer originates from this state and violates the franchise or business opportunity law of the state or foreign jurisdiction into which it is directed, (c) the prospective franchisee is a resident of this state, or (d) the franchise business that is the subject of the offer is to be located or operated, wholly or partly, in this state.

(3) For the purpose of this section, a sale of any franchise is made in this state when: (a) An offer to sell is accepted in this state, (b) an offer originating from this state is accepted and violates the franchise or business opportunity law of the state or foreign jurisdiction in which it is accepted, (c) the purchaser of the franchise is a resident of this state, or (d) the franchise business that is the subject of the sale is to be located or operated, wholly or partly, in this state.

(4) For the purpose of this section, an offer to sell is not made in this state solely because the offer appears: (a) In a newspaper or other publication of general and regular circulation if the publication has had more than two-thirds of its circulation outside this state during the twelve months before the offer is published, or (b) in a broadcast or transmission originating outside this state.

[ 2012 c 121 s 2; 1991 c 226 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 252 s 2.]